Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6080.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1248. (1) This section does not prohibit, impair, or limit the right or duty of a public school employer and a collective bargaining representative to engage in collective bargaining under 1947 PA 336, MCL 423.201 to 423.217. However, a collective bargaining agreement must include, at a minimum, the standards in this section. (2) For teachers, as defined under in section 1249, when filling a vacancy, determining a promotion, placing a teacher in a classroom, or conducting a staffing or program reduction or any other personnel determination resulting in the elimination of a position, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall not adopt, implement, maintain, or comply with a policy or collective bargaining agreement that provides length of service as the sole factor in personnel decisions. This subsection does not prevent length of service from being considered as a tiebreaker if a personnel decision involves 2 or more employees and all other factors distinguishing those employees from each other are equal. (3) The board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy shall adopt, implement, maintain, and comply with clear and transparent procedures for all personnel decisions under this section. Effectiveness as measured under the performance evaluation system in section 1249 or as otherwise collectively bargained must be used as a factor for personnel decisions under this section. Any other relevant factors may be used for personnel decisions under this section, including, but not limited to, the following: (a) The teacher's length of service in a grade level or subject area. (b) The teacher's disciplinary record. (c) Relevant special training. This factor may be based on completion of relevant training other than the professional development or continuing education that is required by the employer or by state law, and integration of that training into instruction in a meaningful way. Any coursework considered under this subdivision must meet at least both of the following: (i) Be degree-eligible credit offered by an institutionally accredited higher education institution and documented on an official academic transcript. (ii) Result in a letter grade. Coursework graded solely on a pass/fail, satisfactory/unsatisfactory, or completion basis is not eligible for consideration under this subdivision unless converted to a letter grade consistent with institutional grading standards. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Coursework" means any course completed by a certificated teacher for the purpose of salary advancement, salary lane change, or other compensation-related advancement under a collective bargaining agreement, school district policy, or salary schedule. (b) "Degree-eligible credit" means academic credit provided by an institutionally accredited higher education institution that may be applied toward a bachelor's degree, postbaccalaureate credential or certificate, master's degree, education specialist degree, or doctoral degree.